Idaho, session 2025, H0448.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Finance the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
State Regulatory Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $556,000
Operating Expenditures 20,000
Capital Outlay 66,800
TOTAL $642,800
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Finance is hereby increased by four (4.00) for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.